Illinois, session 104th, HB1036.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Act is amended by 5changing Section 12.7 and by adding Section 12.8 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2610/12.7)7    Sec. 12.7. Discretionary termination of Illinois State 8Police officers.9    (a) Definitions. For purposes of this Section 12.7:10    "Duty to intervene" means the affirmative duty of an 11officer who has an opportunity to intervene to: (i) intervene 12to prevent or stop another officer in his or her presence from 13using any unauthorized force or force that exceeds the degree 14of force permitted, if any, without regard for chain of 15command; and (ii) report an intervention under item (i) no 16later than 5 days after the incident to the person designated 17or identified by the Director in a manner prescribed by the 18Director, including the date, time, and place of the 19occurrence; the identity, if known, and description of the 20participants; and a description of the intervention actions 21taken and whether they were successful. an obligation to 22intervene to prevent harm from occurring that arises when an 23officer is present and has reason to know:  HB1036- 2 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        (1) that excessive force is being used; or2        (2) that any constitutional violation has been 3    committed by a law enforcement official; and the officer 4    has a realistic opportunity to intervene.5    This duty applies equally to supervisory and 6    nonsupervisory officers. If aid is required, the officer 7    shall not, when reasonable to administer aid, knowingly 8    and willingly refuse to render aid as defined by State or 9    federal law. An officer does not violate this duty if the 10    failure to render aid is due to circumstances such as lack 11    of appropriate specialized training, lack of resources or 12    equipment, or both, or if it is unsafe or impracticable to 13    render aid.14    "Excessive use of force" means using force in violation of 15State or federal law.16    "False statement" means:17        (1) any knowingly false statement provided on a form 18    or report;19        (2) that the writer does not believe to be true; and20        (3) that the writer includes to mislead a public 21    servant in performing that public servant's official 22    functions.23    "Perjury" has the meaning as defined under Sections 32-2 24and 32-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.25    "Tampers with or fabricates evidence" means if a law 26enforcement officer:  HB1036- 3 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        (1) has reason to believe that an official proceeding 2    is pending or may be instituted; and3        (2) alters, destroys, conceals, or removes any record, 4    document, data, video or thing to impair its validity or 5    availability in the proceeding.6    (b) Discretionary termination conduct. The Board may 7terminate an Illinois State Police officer upon a 8determination by the Board that the Illinois State Police 9officer has:10        (1) committed an act that would constitute a felony or 11    misdemeanor which could serve as basis for automatic 12    decertification, whether or not the law enforcement 13    officer was criminally prosecuted, and whether or not the 14    law enforcement officer's employment was terminated;15        (2) exercised excessive use of force;16        (3) failed to comply with the officer's duty to 17    intervene, including through acts or omission;18        (4) tampered with a dash camera or body-worn camera or 19    data recorded by a dash camera or body-worn camera or 20    directed another to tamper with or turn off a dash camera 21    or body-worn camera or data recorded by a dash camera or 22    body-worn camera for the purpose of concealing, destroying 23    or altering potential evidence;24        (5) engaged in the following conduct relating to the 25    reporting, investigation, or prosecution of a crime: 26    committed perjury, made a false statement, or knowingly   HB1036- 4 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    tampered with or fabricated evidence;2        (6) engaged in any unprofessional, unethical, 3    deceptive, or deleterious conduct or practice harmful to 4    the public; such conduct or practice need not have 5    resulted in actual injury to any person. As used in this 6    paragraph, the term "unprofessional conduct" shall include 7    any departure from, or failure to conform to, the minimal 8    standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of an 9    officer.10    (c) If an officer enters a plea of guilty, nolo 11contendere, stipulates to the facts or is found guilty of a 12violation of any law, or if there is any other Board or 13judicial determination that will support any punitive measure 14taken against the officer, such action by the officer or 15judicial entity may be considered for the purposes of this 16Section. Termination under this Section shall be by clear and 17convincing evidence. If the Board votes to terminate, the 18Board shall put its decision in writing, setting forth the 19specific reasons for its decision. Final decisions under this 20Section are reviewable under the Administrative Review Law.21    (d) The Illinois State Police Merit Board shall report all 22terminations under this Section to the Officer Professional 23Conduct Database provided in Section 9.2 of the Illinois 24Police Training Act.25    (e) Nothing in this Act shall require an Illinois State 26Police officer to waive any applicable constitutional rights.  HB1036- 5 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    (f) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the Merit Board 2from administering discipline up to and including termination 3for violations of Illinois State Police policies and 4procedures pursuant to other Sections of this Act.5(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 6    (20 ILCS 2610/12.8 new)7    Sec. 12.8. Retaliation against an officer. A member of the 8Illinois State Police shall not discipline or retaliate in any 9way against an officer for exercising the officer's duty to 10intervene, as that term is defined in Section 12.7, for 11reporting unconstitutional or unlawful conduct, or for failing 12to follow what the officer reasonably believes is an 13unconstitutional or unlawful directive. 14    Section 10. The Local Records Act is amended by changing 15Section 25 as follows: 16    (50 ILCS 205/25)17    Sec. 25. Police misconduct records. Notwithstanding any 18other provision of law to the contrary, all public records and 19nonpublic records related to complaints, investigations, and 20adjudications of police misconduct and records related to 21automatic expungement of misconduct records where an officer 22has been found not to have committed any wrongdoing or the 23complaint was found to be frivolous shall be permanently   HB1036- 6 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1retained and may not be destroyed.2(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21.) 3    Section 15. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 4changing Sections 6, 6.3, and 6.7 as follows: 5    (50 ILCS 705/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 506)6    Sec. 6. Powers and duties of the Board; selection and 7certification of schools. The Board shall select and certify 8schools within the State of Illinois for the purpose of 9providing basic training for probationary law enforcement 10officers, probationary county corrections officers, and court 11security officers and of providing advanced or in-service 12training for permanent law enforcement officers or permanent 13county corrections officers, which schools may be either 14publicly or privately owned and operated. In addition, the 15Board has the following power and duties:16        a. To require law enforcement agencies to furnish such 17    reports and information as the Board deems necessary to 18    fully implement this Act.19        b. To establish appropriate mandatory minimum 20    standards relating to the training of probationary local 21    law enforcement officers or probationary county 22    corrections officers, and in-service training of permanent 23    law enforcement officers.24        c. To provide appropriate certification to those   HB1036- 7 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    probationary officers who successfully complete the 2    prescribed minimum standard basic training course.3        d. To review and approve annual training curriculum 4    for county sheriffs.5        e. To review and approve applicants to ensure that no 6    applicant is admitted to a certified academy unless the 7    applicant is a person of good character and has not been 8    convicted of, found guilty of, entered a plea of guilty 9    to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony 10    offense, any of the misdemeanors in Sections 11-1.50, 11    11-6, 11-6.5, 11-6.6, 11-9.1, 11-9.1B, 11-14, 11-14.1, 12    11-30, 12-2, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 16-1, 17-1, 17-2, 13    26.5-1, 26.5-2, 26.5-3, 28-3, 29-1, any misdemeanor in 14    violation of any Section of Part E of Title III of the 15    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 16    subsection (a) of Section 17-32 of the Criminal Code of 17    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 5 or 5.2 of 18    the Cannabis Control Act, or a crime involving moral 19    turpitude under the laws of this State or any other state 20    which if committed in this State would be punishable as a 21    felony or a crime of moral turpitude, or any felony or 22    misdemeanor in violation of federal law or the law of any 23    state that is the equivalent of any of the offenses 24    specified therein. The Board may appoint investigators who 25    shall enforce the duties conferred upon the Board by this 26    Act.  HB1036- 8 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        For purposes of this paragraph e, a person is 2    considered to have been convicted of, found guilty of, or 3    entered a plea of guilty to, plea of nolo contendere to 4    regardless of whether the adjudication of guilt or 5    sentence is withheld or not entered thereon. This includes 6    sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, or first 7    offender probation, or any similar disposition provided 8    for by law. 9        f. To establish statewide standards for minimum 10    standards regarding regular mental health screenings for 11    probationary and permanent police officers, ensuring that 12    counseling sessions and screenings remain confidential. 13        g. To review and ensure all law enforcement officers 14    remain in compliance with this Act, and any administrative 15    rules adopted under this Act.16        h. To suspend any certificate for a definite period, 17    limit or restrict any certificate, or revoke any 18    certificate.19        i. The Board and the Panel shall have power to secure 20    by its subpoena and bring before it any person or entity in 21    this State and to take testimony either orally or by 22    deposition or both with the same fees and mileage and in 23    the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial 24    proceedings in civil cases in circuit courts of this 25    State. The Board and the Panel shall also have the power to 26    subpoena the production of documents, papers, files,   HB1036- 9 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    books, documents, and records, whether in physical or 2    electronic form, in support of the charges and for 3    defense, and in connection with a hearing or 4    investigation.5        j. The Executive Director, the administrative law 6    judge designated by the Executive Director, and each 7    member of the Board and the Panel shall have the power to 8    administer oaths to witnesses at any hearing that the 9    Board is authorized to conduct under this Act and any 10    other oaths required or authorized to be administered by 11    the Board under this Act.12        k. In case of the neglect or refusal of any person to 13    obey a subpoena issued by the Board and the Panel, any 14    circuit court, upon application of the Board and the 15    Panel, through the Illinois Attorney General, may order 16    such person to appear before the Board and the Panel give 17    testimony or produce evidence, and any failure to obey 18    such order is punishable by the court as a contempt 19    thereof. This order may be served by personal delivery, by 20    email, or by mail to the address of record or email address 21    of record. 22        l. The Board shall have the power to administer state 23    certification examinations. Any and all records related to 24    these examinations, including, but not limited to, test 25    questions, test formats, digital files, answer responses, 26    answer keys, and scoring information shall be exempt from   HB1036- 10 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    disclosure. 2        m. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to units 3    of local government and public institutions of higher 4    education for the purposes of hiring and retaining law 5    enforcement officers. 6        n. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to local 7    law enforcement agencies for costs associated with the 8    expansion and support of National Integrated Ballistic 9    Information Network (NIBIN) and other ballistic technology 10    equipment for ballistic testing. 11        o. To adopt rules that must be followed by each law 12    enforcement agency prohibiting a member of a law 13    enforcement agency from disciplining or retaliating in any 14    way against a law enforcement officer for exercising the 15    officer's duty to intervene, as that term is defined in 16    Section 6.3, for reporting unconstitutional or unlawful 17    conduct, or for failing to follow what the officer 18    reasonably believes is an unconstitutional or unlawful 19    directive. 20(Source: P.A. 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 21102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 22    (50 ILCS 705/6.3)23    Sec. 6.3. Discretionary decertification of full-time and 24part-time law enforcement officers.25    (a) Definitions. For purposes of this Section 6.3:  HB1036- 11 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    "Duty to intervene" means the affirmative duty of an 2officer who has an opportunity to intervene to: (i) intervene 3to prevent or stop another officer in his or her presence from 4using any unauthorized force or force that exceeds the degree 5of force permitted, if any, without regard for chain of 6command; and (ii) report an intervention under item (i) no 7later than 5 days after the incident to the person designated 8or identified by the law enforcement agency in a manner 9prescribed by the agency, including the date, time, and place 10of the occurrence; the identity, if known, and description of 11the participants; and a description of the intervention 12actions taken and whether they were successful. an obligation 13to intervene to prevent harm from occurring that arises when: 14an officer is present, and has reason to know (1) that 15excessive force is being used or that any constitutional 16violation has been committed by a law enforcement official; 17and (2) the officer has a realistic opportunity to intervene. 18This duty applies equally to supervisory and nonsupervisory 19officers. If aid is required, the officer shall not, when 20reasonable to administer aid, knowingly and willingly refuse 21to render aid as defined by State or federal law. An officer 22does not violate this duty if the failure to render aid is due 23to circumstances such as lack of appropriate specialized 24training, lack of resources or equipment, or if it is unsafe or 25impracticable to render aid. 26    "Excessive use of force" means using force in violation of   HB1036- 12 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1State or federal law.2    "False statement" means (1) any knowingly false statement 3provided on a form or report, (2) that the writer does not 4believe to be true, and (3) that the writer includes to mislead 5a public servant in performing the public servant's official 6functions.7    "Perjury" means that as defined under Sections 32-2 and 832-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.9    "Tampers with or fabricates evidence" means if a law 10enforcement officer (1) has reason to believe that an official 11proceeding is pending or may be instituted, and (2) alters, 12destroys, conceals, or removes any record, document, data, 13video or thing to impair its validity or availability in the 14proceeding.15    (b) Decertification conduct. The Board has the authority 16to decertify a full-time or a part-time law enforcement 17officer upon a determination by the Board that the law 18enforcement officer has:19        (1) committed an act that would constitute a felony or 20    misdemeanor which could serve as basis for automatic 21    decertification, whether or not the law enforcement 22    officer was criminally prosecuted, and whether or not the 23    law enforcement officer's employment was terminated;24        (2) exercised excessive use of force;25        (3) failed to comply with the officer's duty to 26    intervene, including through acts or omissions;  HB1036- 13 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        (4) tampered with a dash camera or body-worn camera or 2    data recorded by a dash camera or body-worn camera or 3    directed another to tamper with or turn off a dash camera 4    or body-worn camera or data recorded by a dash camera or 5    body-worn camera for the purpose of concealing, destroying 6    or altering potential evidence;7        (5) engaged in the following conduct relating to the 8    reporting, investigation, or prosecution of a crime: 9    committed perjury, made a false statement, or knowingly 10    tampered with or fabricated evidence; and11        (6) engaged in any unprofessional, unethical, 12    deceptive, or deleterious conduct or practice harmful to 13    the public; such conduct or practice need not have 14    resulted in actual injury to any person. As used in this 15    paragraph, the term "unprofessional conduct" shall include 16    any departure from, or failure to conform to, the minimal 17    standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of an 18    officer.19    (b-5) The Board has the authority to decertify a full-time 20or part-time law enforcement officer notwithstanding whether a 21law enforcement agency takes disciplinary action against a law 22enforcement officer for the same underlying conduct as 23outlined in subsection (b).24    (c) Notice of Alleged Violation.25        (1) The following individuals and agencies shall 26    notify the Board within 7 days of becoming aware of any   HB1036- 14 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    violation described in subsection (b):2            (A) A law enforcement agency as defined in Section 3        2 or any law enforcement officer of this State. For 4        this subsection (c), law enforcement agency includes, 5        but is not limited to, a civilian review board, an 6        inspector general, and legal counsel for a law 7        enforcement agency.8            (B) The Executive Director of the Board;9            (C) A State's Attorney's Office of this State.10        "Becoming aware" does not include confidential 11    communications between agency lawyers and agencies 12    regarding legal advice. For purposes of this subsection, 13    "law enforcement agency" does not include the Illinois 14    Attorney General when providing legal representation to a 15    law enforcement officer under the State Employee 16    Indemnification Act.17        (2) Any person may also notify the Board of any 18    conduct the person believes a law enforcement officer has 19    committed as described in subsection (b). Such 20    notifications may be made confidentially. Notwithstanding 21    any other provision in state law or any collective 22    bargaining agreement, the Board shall accept notice and 23    investigate any allegations from individuals who remain 24    confidential.25        (3) Upon written request, the Board shall disclose to 26    the individual or entity who filed a notice of violation   HB1036- 15 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    the status of the Board's review.2    (d) Form. The notice of violation reported under 3subsection (c) shall be on a form prescribed by the Board in 4its rules. The form shall be publicly available by paper and 5electronic means. The form shall include fields for the 6following information, at a minimum:7        (1) the full name, address, and telephone number of 8    the person submitting the notice;9        (2) if submitted under subsection (c)(1), the agency 10    name and title of the person submitting the notice;11        (3) the full name, badge number, employing agency, and 12    physical description of the officer, if known;13        (4) the full name or names, address or addresses, 14    telephone number or numbers, and physical description or 15    descriptions of any witnesses, if known;16        (5) a concise statement of facts that describe the 17    alleged violation and any copies of supporting evidence 18    including but not limited to any photographic, video, or 19    audio recordings of the incident;20        (6) whether the person submitting the notice has 21    notified any other agency; and22        (7) an option for an individual, who submits directly 23    to the Board, to consent to have the individual's identity 24    disclosed. The identity of any individual providing 25    information or reporting any possible or alleged violation 26    to the Board shall be kept confidential and may not be   HB1036- 16 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    disclosed without the consent of that individual, unless 2    the individual consents to disclosure of the individual's 3    name or disclosure of the individual's identity is 4    otherwise required by law. The confidentiality granted by 5    this subsection does not preclude the disclosure of the 6    identity of a person in any capacity other than as the 7    source of an allegation. 8    Nothing in this subsection (d) shall preclude the Board 9from receiving, investigating, or acting upon allegations made 10confidentially or in a format different from the form provided 11for in this subsection.12    (e) Preliminary review.13        (1) The Board shall complete a preliminary review of 14    the allegations to determine whether there is sufficient 15    information to warrant a further investigation of any 16    violations of the Act. Upon initiating a preliminary 17    review of the allegations, the Board shall notify the head 18    of the law enforcement agency that employs the law 19    enforcement officer who is the subject of the allegations. 20    At the request of the Board, the law enforcement agency 21    must submit any copies of investigative findings, 22    evidence, or documentation to the Board in accordance with 23    rules adopted by the Board to facilitate the Board's 24    preliminary review. The Board may correspond with the law 25    enforcement agency, official records clerks or any 26    investigative agencies in conducting its preliminary   HB1036- 17 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    review.2        (2) During the preliminary review, the Board will take 3    all reasonable steps to discover any and all objective 4    verifiable evidence relevant to the alleged violation 5    through the identification, retention, review, and 6    analysis of all currently available evidence, including, 7    but not limited to: all time-sensitive evidence, audio and 8    video evidence, physical evidence, arrest reports, 9    photographic evidence, GPS records, computer data, lab 10    reports, medical documents, and witness interviews. All 11    reasonable steps will be taken to preserve relevant 12    evidence identified during the preliminary investigation.13        (3) If after a preliminary review of the alleged 14    violation or violations, the Board believes there is 15    sufficient information to warrant further investigation of 16    any violations of this Act, the alleged violation or 17    violations shall be assigned for investigation in 18    accordance with subsection (f).19        (4) If after a review of the allegations, the Board 20    believes there is insufficient information supporting the 21    allegations to warrant further investigation, it may close 22    a notice. Notification of the Board's decision to close a 23    notice shall be sent to all relevant individuals, 24    agencies, and any entities that received notice of the 25    violation under subsection (c) within 30 days of the 26    notice being closed, except in cases where the notice is   HB1036- 18 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    submitted anonymously if the complainant is unknown.2        (5) Except when the Board has received notice under 3    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (c), no 4    later than 30 days after receiving notice, the Board shall 5    report any notice of violation it receives to the relevant 6    law enforcement agency, unless reporting the notice would 7    jeopardize any subsequent investigation. The Board shall 8    also record any notice of violation it receives to the 9    Officer Professional Conduct Database in accordance with 10    Section 9.2. The Board shall report to the appropriate 11    State's Attorney any alleged violations that contain 12    allegations, claims, or factual assertions that, if true, 13    would constitute a violation of Illinois law. The Board 14    shall inform the law enforcement officer via certified 15    mail that it has received a notice of violation against 16    the law enforcement officer.17        If the Board determines that due to the circumstances 18    and the nature of the allegation that it would not be 19    prudent to notify the law enforcement officer and the 20    officer's law enforcement agency unless and until the 21    filing of a Formal Complaint, the Board shall document in 22    the file the reason or reasons a notification was not 23    made.24        (6) If the law enforcement officer is involved in a 25    criminal proceeding on the same subject as the notice of 26    violation, the Board is responsible for maintaining a   HB1036- 19 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    current status report including court dates, hearings, 2    pleas, adjudication status and sentencing. A State's 3    Attorney's Office must notify the Board of any criminal 4    charges filed against a law enforcement officer, and must 5    provide updates of significant developments to the Board 6    in a timely manner but no later than 30 days after such 7    developments.8    (f) Investigations; requirements. Investigations are to be 9assigned after a preliminary review, unless the investigations 10were closed under paragraph (4) of subsection (e), as follows 11in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection (f).12        (1) A law enforcement agency that submits a notice of 13    violation to the Board under subparagraph (A) of paragraph 14    (1) of subsection (c) shall be responsible for conducting 15    an investigation of the underlying allegations except 16    when: (i) the law enforcement agency refers the notice to 17    another law enforcement agency or the Board for 18    investigation and such other agency or the Board agrees to 19    conduct the investigation; (ii) an external, independent, 20    or civilian oversight agency conducts the investigation in 21    accordance with local ordinance or other applicable law; 22    or (iii) the Board has determined that it will conduct the 23    investigation based upon the facts and circumstances of 24    the alleged violation, including but not limited to, 25    investigations regarding the Chief or Sheriff of a law 26    enforcement agency, familial conflict of interests,   HB1036- 20 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    complaints involving a substantial portion of a law 2    enforcement agency, or complaints involving a policy of a 3    law enforcement agency. Any agency or entity conducting an 4    investigation under this paragraph (1) shall submit 5    quarterly reports to the Board regarding the progress of 6    the investigation. The quarterly report shall be reviewed 7    by the individual or individuals at the Board who 8    conducted the preliminary review, if available. 9    Any agency or entity conducting an investigation under 10    this paragraph (1) shall, within 7 days of completing an 11    investigation, deliver an Investigative Summary Report and 12    copies of any administrative evidence to the Board. If the 13    Board finds an investigation conducted under this 14    paragraph (1) is incomplete, unsatisfactory, or deficient 15    in any way, the Board may direct the investigating entity 16    or agency to take any additional investigative steps 17    deemed necessary to thoroughly and satisfactorily complete 18    the investigation, or the Board may take any steps 19    necessary to complete the investigation. The investigating 20    entity or agency or, when necessary, the Board will then 21    amend and re-submit the Investigative Summary Report to 22    the Board for approval.23        The Board shall submit a report to the investigating 24    entity disclosing the name, address, and telephone numbers 25    of persons who have knowledge of facts which are the 26    subject of the investigation and identifying the subject   HB1036- 21 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    matter of their knowledge. 2        (2) The Board shall investigate and complete an 3    Investigative Summary Report when a State's Attorney's 4    Office submits a notice of violation to the Board under 5    (c)(1)(C).6        (3) When a person submits a notice to the Board under 7    paragraph (2) of subsection (c), The Board shall assign 8    the investigation to the law enforcement agency that 9    employs the law enforcement officer, except when: (i) the 10    law enforcement agency requests to refer the notice to 11    another law enforcement agency or the Board for 12    investigation and such other agency or the Board agrees to 13    conduct the investigation; (ii) an external, independent, 14    or civilian oversight agency conducts the investigation in 15    accordance with local ordinance or other applicable law; 16    or (iii) the Board has determined that it will conduct the 17    investigation based upon the facts and circumstances of 18    the alleged violation, including but not limited to, 19    investigations regarding the Chief or Sheriff of a law 20    enforcement agency, familial conflict of interests, 21    complaints involving a substantial portion of a law 22    enforcement agency, or complaints involving a policy of a 23    law enforcement agency. 24        The investigating entity or agency shall submit 25    quarterly reports to the Board regarding the progress of 26    the investigation in a form to be determined by the Board.   HB1036- 22 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    The quarterly report shall be reviewed by the individual 2    at the Board who conducted the preliminary review, if 3    available. 4    The investigating entity or agency shall, within 7 days of 5    completing an investigation, deliver an Investigative 6    Summary Report and copies of any evidence to the Board. If 7    the Board finds an investigation conducted under this 8    subsection (f)(3) is incomplete, unsatisfactory, or 9    deficient in any way, the Board may direct the 10    investigating entity to take any additional investigative 11    steps deemed necessary to thoroughly and satisfactorily 12    complete the investigation, or the Board may take any 13    steps necessary to complete the investigation. The 14    investigating entity or agency or, when necessary, the 15    Board will then amend and re-submit the Investigative 16    Summary Report to the Board for approval. The 17    investigating entity shall cooperate with and assist the 18    Board, as necessary, in any subsequent investigation.19        (4) Concurrent Investigations. The Board may, at any 20    point, initiate a concurrent investigation under this 21    section. The original investigating entity shall timely 22    communicate, coordinate, and cooperate with the Board to 23    the fullest extent. The Board shall promulgate rules that 24    shall address, at a minimum, the sharing of information 25    and investigative means such as subpoenas and interviewing 26    witnesses.  HB1036- 23 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        (5) Investigative Summary Report. An Investigative 2    Summary Report shall contain, at a minimum, the 3    allegations and elements within each allegation followed 4    by the testimonial, documentary, or physical evidence that 5    is relevant to each such allegation or element listed and 6    discussed in association with it. All persons who have 7    been interviewed and listed in the Investigative Summary 8    Report will be identified as a complainant, witness, 9    person with specialized knowledge, or law enforcement 10    employee.11        (6) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a written 12    policy regarding the investigation of conduct under 13    subsection (a) that involves a law enforcement officer 14    employed by that law enforcement agency. The written 15    policy adopted must include the following, at a minimum:16            (a) Each law enforcement officer shall immediately 17        report any conduct under subsection (b) to the 18        appropriate supervising officer.19            (b) The written policy under this Section shall be 20        available for inspection and copying under the Freedom 21        of Information Act, and not subject to any exemption 22        of that Act.23        (7) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a law 24    enforcement agency from conducting an investigation for 25    the purpose of internal discipline. However, any such 26    investigation shall be conducted in a manner that avoids   HB1036- 24 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    interference with, and preserves the integrity of, any 2    separate investigation by the Board being conducted.3    (g) Formal complaints. Upon receipt of an Investigative 4Summary Report, the Board shall review the Report and any 5relevant evidence obtained and determine whether there is 6reasonable basis to believe that the law enforcement officer 7committed any conduct that would be deemed a violation of this 8Act. If after reviewing the Report and any other relevant 9evidence obtained, the Board determines that a reasonable 10basis does exist, the Board shall file a formal complaint with 11the Certification Review Panel.12    (h) Formal Complaint Hearing.13        (1) Upon issuance of a formal complaint, the Panel 14    shall set the matter for an initial hearing in front of an 15    administrative law judge. At least 30 days before the date 16    set for an initial hearing, the Panel must, in writing, 17    notify the law enforcement officer subject to the 18    complaint of the following:19            (i) the allegations against the law enforcement 20        officer, the time and place for the hearing, and 21        whether the law enforcement officer's certification 22        has been temporarily suspended under Section 8.3;23            (ii) the right to file a written answer to the 24        complaint with the Panel within 30 days after service 25        of the notice;26            (iii) if the law enforcement officer fails to   HB1036- 25 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        comply with the notice of the default order in 2        paragraph (2), the Panel shall enter a default order 3        against the law enforcement officer along with a 4        finding that the allegations in the complaint are 5        deemed admitted, and that the law enforcement 6        officer's certification may be revoked as a result; 7        and8            (iv) the law enforcement officer may request an 9        informal conference to surrender the officer's 10        certification.11        (2) The Board shall send the law enforcement officer 12    notice of the default order. The notice shall state that 13    the officer has 30 days to notify the Board in writing of 14    their desire to have the order vacated and to appear 15    before the Board. If the law enforcement officer does not 16    notify the Board within 30 days, the Board may set the 17    matter for hearing. If the matter is set for hearing, the 18    Board shall send the law enforcement officer the notice of 19    the date, time and location of the hearing. If the law 20    enforcement officer or counsel for the officer does 21    appear, at the Board's discretion, the hearing may proceed 22    or may be continued to a date and time agreed upon by all 23    parties. If on the date of the hearing, neither the law 24    enforcement officer nor counsel for the officer appears, 25    the Board may proceed with the hearing for default in 26    their absence.   HB1036- 26 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1        (3) If the law enforcement officer fails to comply 2    with paragraph (2), all of the allegations contained in 3    the complaint shall be deemed admitted and the law 4    enforcement officer shall be decertified if, by a majority 5    vote of the panel, the conduct charged in the complaint is 6    found to constitute sufficient grounds for decertification 7    under this Act. Notice of the decertification decision may 8    be served by personal delivery, by mail, or, at the 9    discretion of the Board, by electronic means as adopted by 10    rule to the address or email address specified by the law 11    enforcement officer in the officer's last communication 12    with the Board. Notice shall also be provided to the law 13    enforcement officer's employing law enforcement agency.14        (4) The Board, at the request of the law enforcement 15    officer subject to the Formal Complaint, may suspend a 16    hearing on a Formal Complaint for no more than one year if 17    a concurrent criminal matter is pending. If the law 18    enforcement officer requests to have the hearing 19    suspended, the law enforcement officer's certification 20    shall be deemed inactive until the law enforcement 21    officer's Formal Complaint hearing concludes. The Board or 22    the law enforcement officer may request to have the 23    hearing suspended for up to 6 additional months for good 24    cause. This request may be renewed. For purposes of this 25    paragraph (4), "good cause" means an incident or 26    occurrence that is beyond the control of the requester and   HB1036- 27 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    that prevents the hearing from occurring, or holding the 2    hearing would impose an undue hardship or prejudice on the 3    requester. 4        (5) Surrender of certification or waiver. Upon the 5    Board's issuance of a complaint, and prior to hearing on 6    the matter, a law enforcement officer may choose to 7    surrender the officer's certification or waiver by 8    notifying the Board in writing of the officer's decision 9    to do so. Upon receipt of such notification from the law 10    enforcement officer, the Board shall immediately decertify 11    the officer, or revoke any waiver previously granted. In 12    the case of a surrender of certification or waiver, the 13    Board's proceeding shall terminate.14        (6) Appointment of administrative law judges. The 15    Board shall retain any attorney licensed to practice law 16    in the State of Illinois to serve as an administrative law 17    judge in any action involving a law enforcement officer 18    under this Act. The administrative law judge shall be 19    retained to a term of no greater than 4 years. If more than 20    one judge is retained, the terms shall be staggered. The 21    administrative law judge has full authority to conduct the 22    hearings.23        Administrative law judges will receive initial and 24    annual training that is adequate in quality, quantity, 25    scope, and type, and will cover, at minimum the following 26    topics:  HB1036- 28 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1            (i) constitutional and other relevant law on 2        police-community encounters, including the law on the 3        use of force and stops, searches, and arrests;4            (ii) police tactics;5            (iii) investigations of police conduct;6            (iv) impartial policing;7            (v) policing individuals in crisis;8            (vi) Illinois police policies, procedures, and 9        disciplinary rules;10            (vii) procedural justice; and11            (viii) community outreach.12        The Board shall determine the content and extent of 13    the training within the scope provided for by this 14    subsection. 15        (7) Hearing. At the hearing, the administrative law 16    judge will hear the allegations alleged in the complaint. 17    The law enforcement officer, the counsel of the officer's 18    choosing, and the Board, or the officer's counsel, shall 19    be afforded the opportunity to present any pertinent 20    statements, testimony, evidence, and arguments. The law 21    enforcement officer shall be afforded the opportunity to 22    request that the Board compel the attendance of witnesses 23    and production of related documents. After the conclusion 24    of the hearing, the administrative law judge shall report 25    any findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommended 26    disposition to the Panel. If the law enforcement officer   HB1036- 29 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    objects to any procedural or substantive legal portion of 2    the report, the officer may do so by written brief filed 3    with the Panel within 14 days after receipt of the report. 4    The Panel may grant reasonable extensions for good cause 5    shown or when mutually agreed upon by the parties. 6        No later than 28 days before the hearing, a party 7    shall disclose the following:8            (i) The name and, if known, the address and 9        telephone number of each individual likely to have 10        information relevant to the hearing that the 11        disclosing party may use to support its claims or 12        defenses. This includes, but is not limited to, any 13        name that has previously been held as confidential by 14        the Board.15            (ii) A copy of any documents and videos that are in 16        the possession, custody, or control of the party, and 17        that the disclosing party may use to support its 18        claims or defenses. 19        (8) Certification Review Meeting. Upon receipt of the 20    administrative law judge's findings of fact, conclusions 21    of law, and recommended disposition, and any submitted 22    objections from the law enforcement officer, the Panel 23    shall call for a certification review meeting.24        In such a meeting, the Panel may adjourn into a closed 25    conference for the purposes of deliberating on the 26    evidence presented during the hearing. In closed   HB1036- 30 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    conference, the Panel shall consider the hearing officer's 2    findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommended 3    disposition and may deliberate on all evidence and 4    testimony received and may consider the weight and 5    credibility to be given to the evidence received. No new 6    or additional evidence may be presented to the Panel. 7    After concluding its deliberations, the Panel shall 8    convene in open session for its consideration of the 9    matter. If a simple majority of the Panel finds that no 10    allegations in the complaint supporting one or more 11    charges of misconduct are proven by clear and convincing 12    evidence, then the Panel shall recommend to the Board that 13    the complaint be dismissed. If a simple majority of the 14    Panel finds that the allegations in the complaint 15    supporting one or more charges of misconduct are proven by 16    clear and convincing evidence, then the Panel shall 17    recommend to the Board to decertify the officer. The Panel 18    shall prepare a summary report as soon as practicable 19    after the completion of the meeting including the 20    following: the hearing officer's findings of fact, 21    conclusions of law, recommended disposition, and the 22    Panel's order.23        (9) Final action by the Board. After receiving the 24    Panel's recommendations and any objections by the law 25    enforcement officer, and after due consideration of the 26    Panel's recommendations, the Board, by majority vote,   HB1036- 31 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    shall issue a final decision to decertify the law 2    enforcement officer or take no action in regard to the law 3    enforcement officer. No new or additional evidence may be 4    presented to the Board. If the Board makes a final 5    decision contrary to the recommendations of the Panel, the 6    Board shall set forth in its final written decision the 7    specific written reasons for not following the Panel's 8    recommendations. A copy of the Board's final decision 9    shall be served upon the law enforcement officer by the 10    Board, either personally or as provided in this Act for 11    the service of a notice of hearing. A copy of the Board's 12    final decision also shall be delivered to the last 13    employing law enforcement agency, the complainant, and the 14    Panel.15        (10) Reconsideration of the Board's Decision. Within 16    30 days after service of the Board's final decision, the 17    Panel or the law enforcement officer may file a written 18    motion for reconsideration with the Review Committee. The 19    motion for reconsideration shall specify the particular 20    grounds for reconsideration. The non-moving party may 21    respond to the motion for reconsideration. The Review 22    Committee shall only address the issues raised by the 23    parties. 24        The Review Committee may deny the motion for 25    reconsideration, or it may grant the motion in whole or in 26    part and issue a new final decision in the matter. The   HB1036- 32 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    Review Committee must notify the law enforcement officer 2    and their last employing law enforcement agency within 14 3    days of a denial and state the reasons for denial.4    (i) This Section applies to conduct by a full-time or 5part-time law enforcement officer in violation of subsection 6(b) that occurred before, on, or after the effective date of 7this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly.8    (j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 9the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 10102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 111, 2022. 12(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 13    (50 ILCS 705/6.7)14    Sec. 6.7. Certification and decertification procedures 15under Act exclusive. Notwithstanding any other law, the 16certification and decertification procedures, including the 17conduct of any investigation or hearing, under this Act are 18the sole and exclusive procedures for certification as law 19enforcement officers in Illinois and are not subject to 20collective bargaining under the Illinois Public Labor 21Relations Act or appealable except as set forth herein. The 22provisions of any collective bargaining agreement adopted by a 23law enforcement agency and covering the law enforcement 24officer or officers under investigation shall be inapplicable 25to any investigation or hearing conducted under this Act.  HB1036- 33 -LRB104 03251 RTM 13273 b1    An individual has no property interest in law enforcement 2certification at the time of initial certification or at any 3time thereafter, including, but not limited to, after 4decertification or after the officer's certification has been 5deemed inactive. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 6create a requirement that a law enforcement agency shall 7continue to employ a law enforcement officer who has been 8decertified.9(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 10    (50 ILCS 727/1-35 rep.)11    Section 20. The Police and Community Relations Improvement 12Act is amended by repealing Section 1-35.